Washington statutes.
RCW 23B.01.590

Public service companies entitled to deductions.

The annual fee required to be paid to the Washington utilities and transportation commission by any public service corporation shall be deducted from the annual license fee provided in this title and the excess only shall be collected.

It shall be the duty of the commission to furnish to the secretary of state on or before July 1st of each year a list of all public service corporations with the amount of annual license fees paid to the commission for the current year.

[ 1989 c 165 s 25.]